District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.04

Record-retention requirements.

A title insurance producer shall maintain sufficient records of its affairs, including its escrow operations, if any, and escrow trust accounts, if any, so that the Commissioner may adequately ensure that the title insurance producer is in compliance with this chapter. The Commissioner may prescribe the specific record entries and documents to be kept and the length of time for which the records shall be maintained, for a period of not to exceed 3 years, unless otherwise required by the RESPA.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2125, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2125 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).